Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
468M

ACTIVITY
PROVIDERS AND ACTIVITY DESKS

Section

468M-1 Definitions

468M-2 Registration required

468M-2.5 Activity desk principal; responsibilities

468M-3 Prohibited acts

468M-4 Payment provision

468M-5 Legal rate; computation

468M-6 Injunctive relief; suits

468M-7 Action for damages

468M-8 Requirements for offering discounts

468M-9 Client trust accounts; maintenance of and
withdrawal

from accounts

468M-9.5 Record keeping requirements for client
trust accounts

468M-10 Performance bond and irrevocable letter of
credit as

alternative to client trust account
required of

activity desks; coverage amount and
computation; annual

report and option; adjustments; coverage
upon transfer

468M-11 Violations; fraud

468M-12 Restitution

468M-13 Injunctions

468M-14 Consumer right of action

468M-15 Remedies cumulative

468M-16 Criminal penalties

468M-17 Rules

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1991, c 240, pt of §1.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next